Utah statutes.
26-21-2.1.   Services.

(1)  General acute hospitals and specialty hospitals shall remain open and be continuously ready to receive patients 24 hours of every day in a year and have an attending medical staff consisting of one or more physicians licensed to practice medicine and surgery under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.

(2)  A specialty hospital shall provide on-site all basic services required of a general acute hospital that are needed for the diagnosis, therapy, or rehabilitation offered to or required by patients admitted to or cared for in the facility.

(3) (a)  A home health agency shall provide at least licensed nursing services or therapeutic services directly through the agency employees.

(b)  A home health agency may provide additional services itself or under arrangements with another agency, organization, facility, or individual.



Amended by Chapter 209, 1997 General Session

